Washington statutes.
RCW 18.30.090

Licensing requirements.

The secretary shall issue a license to practice denturism to an applicant who submits a completed application, pays the appropriate fees, and meets the following requirements:

(1) A person currently licensed to practice denturism under statutory provisions of another state, territory of the United States, District of Columbia, or Puerto Rico, with substantially equivalent licensing standards to this chapter shall be licensed without examination upon providing the board with the following:

(a) Proof of successfully passing a written and clinical examination for denturism in a state, territory of the United States, District of Columbia, or Puerto Rico, that the board has determined has substantially equivalent licensing standards as those in this chapter, including but not limited to both the written and clinical examinations; and

(b) An affidavit from the licensing agency where the person is licensed or certified attesting to the fact of the person's licensure or certification.

(2) A person graduating from a formal denturism program shall be licensed if he or she:

(a) Documents successful completion of formal training with a major course of study in denturism of not less than two years in duration at an educational institution approved by the board; and

(b) Passes a written and clinical examination approved by the board.

[ 2013 c 171 s 3; 2002 c 160 s 6; 1995 c 198 s 20; 1995 c 1 s 10 (Initiative Measure No. 607, approved November 8, 1994).]

NOTES:

Effective date—1995 c 198 ss 18-25: See note following RCW 18.30.020.